Vermont, session 2025-2026, H19.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 2501 is amended to read:
§ 2501. GRAND LARCENY
(a) A person who steals from the actual or constructive possession of
another, other than from his or her person, money, goods, chattels, bank notes,
bonds, promissory notes, bills of exchange or other bills, orders, or certificates,
or a book of accounts for or concerning money, or goods due or to become due
or to be delivered, or a deed or writing containing a conveyance of land, or any
other valuable contract in force, or a receipt, release or defeasance, writ,
process, or public record, shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined
not more than $5,000.00, or both, if:
VT LEG #379116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.19
2025 Page 2 of 2
(1) the money or other property stolen exceeds $900.00 in value; or
(2) the property stolen is a firearm of any value.
(b) As used in this section, “firearm” has the same meaning as in section
4016 of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379116 v.1